New York, session 2025-2026, A6970.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 1212 of the vehicle and traffic law, as amended by 2 chapter 436 of the laws of 2024, is amended to read as follows: 3 § 1212. Reckless driving. (a) (i) Reckless driving shall mean driving 4 or using any motor vehicle, motorcycle or any other vehicle propelled by 5 any power other than muscular power or any appliance or accessory there- 6 of in a manner which unreasonably interferes with the free and proper 7 use of the public highway or any parking lot, or unreasonably endangers 8 users of the public highway or any parking lot. Reckless driving is 9 prohibited. Every person violating this provision shall be guilty of a 10 misdemeanor. 11 (ii) Aggravated reckless driving shall mean reckless driving involving 12 harm to an identifiable person or property, and shall constitute a class 13 A misdemeanor. 14 (b) As used in this section, "parking lot" shall mean any area or 15 areas of private property, including a driveway, near or contiguous to 16 and provided in connection with premises and used as a means of access 17 to and egress from a public highway to such premises and having a capac- 18 ity for the parking of four or more motor vehicles. The provisions of 19 this section shall not apply to any area or areas of private property 20 comprising all or part of property on which is situated a one or two 21 family residence. 22 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD08943-01-5